Massachusetts, session 194th, H4224.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Notwithstanding section 10 of chapter 39 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law or by-law to the contrary, all votes cast by the voters of the Town of New
Salem at the annual town election held on May 5. 2025, are hereby ratified, validated and
confirmed in all respects, notwithstanding any defects or omissions in the calling of said town
election.
SECTION 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1